Utah statutes.
36-11-201.   Lobbyist, principal, and government officer financial reporting
requirements -- Prohibition for related person to make expenditures.
(1) (a) (i)  A lobbyist shall file financial reports with the lieutenant
governor on or before the due dates specified in Subsection (2).
(ii)  If a lobbyist has not made an expenditure during the quarterly reporting
period, the lobbyist shall file a financial report listing the amount of
expenditures as "none."
(b)  A government officer or principal that makes an expenditure during any of
the quarterly reporting periods under Subsection (2)(a) shall file a financial
report with the lieutenant governor on or before the date that a report for
that quarter is due.
(2) (a)  A financial report is due quarterly on the following dates:
(i)  April 10, for the period of January 1 through March 31;
(ii)  July 10, for the period of April 1 through June 30;
(iii)  October 10, for the period of July 1 through September 30; and
(iv)  January 10, for the period of October 1 through December 31 of the
previous year.
(b)  If the due date for a financial report falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or
legal holiday, the report is due on the next succeeding business day.
(c)  A financial report is timely filed if it is filed electronically before
the close of regular office hours on or before the due date.
(3)  A financial report shall contain:
(a)  the total amount of expenditures made to benefit any public official
during the quarterly reporting period;
(b)  the total amount of expenditures made, by the type of public official,
during the quarterly reporting period;
(c)  for the financial report due on January 10:
(i)  the total amount of expenditures made to benefit any public official
during the last calendar year; and
(ii)  the total amount of expenditures made, by the type of public official,
during the last calendar year;
(d)  a disclosure of each expenditure made during the quarterly reporting
period to reimburse or pay for travel or lodging for a public official,
including:
(i)  each travel destination and each lodging location;
(ii)  the name of each public official who benefitted from the expenditure on
travel or lodging;
(iii)  the public official type of each public official named;
(iv)  for each public official named, a listing of the amount and purpose of
each expenditure made for travel or lodging; and
(v)  the total amount of expenditures listed under Subsection (3)(d)(iv);
(e)  a disclosure of aggregate daily expenditures greater than $10 made during
the quarterly reporting period including:
(i)  the date and purpose of the expenditure;
(ii)  the location of the expenditure;
(iii)  the name of any public official benefitted by the expenditure;
(iv)  the type of the public official benefitted by the expenditure; and
(v)  the total monetary worth of the benefit that the expenditure conferred on
any public official;
(f)  for each public official who was employed by the lobbyist, principal, or
government officer, a list that provides:
(i)  the name of the public official; and
(ii)  the nature of the employment with the public official;
(g)  each bill or resolution, by number and short title, on behalf of which
the lobbyist, principal, or government officer made an expenditure to a public
official;
(h)  a description of each executive action on behalf of which the lobbyist,
principal, or government officer made an expenditure to a public official;
(i)  the general purposes, interests, and nature of the entities that the
lobbyist, principal, or government officer filing the report represents; and
(j)  for a lobbyist, a certification that the information provided in the
report is true, accurate, and complete to the lobbyist's best knowledge and
belief.
(4)  A related person may not, while assisting a lobbyist, principal, or
government officer in lobbying, make an expenditure that benefits a public
official under circumstances that would otherwise fall within the disclosure
requirements of this chapter if the expenditure was made by the lobbyist,
principal, or government officer.
(5)  The lieutenant governor shall:
(a) (i)  develop a preprinted form for a financial report required by this
section; and
(ii)  make copies of the form available to a lobbyist, principal, or
government officer who requests a form; and
(b)  provide a reporting system that allows a lobbyist, principal, or
government officer to submit a financial report required by this chapter via
the Internet.
(6) (a)  A lobbyist and a principal shall continue to file a financial report
required by this section until the lobbyist or principal files a statement
with the lieutenant governor that:
(i)  states:
(A)  for a lobbyist, that the lobbyist has ceased lobbying activities; or
(B)  for a principal, that the principal no longer employs an individual as a
lobbyist;
(ii)  in the case of a lobbyist, states that the lobbyist is surrendering the
lobbyist's license;
(iii)  contains a listing, as required by this section, of all previously
unreported expenditures that have been made through the date of the statement;
and
(iv)  states that the lobbyist or principal will not make any additional
expenditure that is not disclosed on the statement unless the lobbyist or
principal complies with the disclosure and licensing requirements of this
chapter.
(b)  A person that fails to renew the lobbyist's license or otherwise ceases
to be licensed is required to file a financial report quarterly until the
person files the statement required by Subsection (6)(a).
